Arkansas, session 2025, HB1093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Health - Health Services Permit Agency for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U025U ADH HEALTH PERMIT SERVICES DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) G272C ADH HSPA DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(3) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(4) C017C ADH HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4
*MAH009*
01/06/2025 2:50:23 PM MAH009

HB1093

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Health - Health Services Permit Agency - State
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $307,688
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 94,436
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 60,835
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,274
(C) PROF. FEES 16,267
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $480,500

SECTION 3. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD. Any unexpended balance of funds generated by fees and fines pursuant
to Arkansas Code 20-8-103 et. seq. deposited into the Miscellaneous Agencies
Fund Account which remain at the close of each state fiscal year shall be
carried forward to the next state fiscal year to be used for the same intent
and purposes as set forth in law.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance funding as authorized herein, may
be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting,
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
01/06/2025 2:50:23 PM MAH009

HB1093
or line item, the funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 4. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
01/06/2025 2:50:23 PM MAH009

HB1093
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.


























01/06/2025 2:50:23 PM MAH009